Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB7.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 80-113 is hereby amended to read as follows:
80-113. The township board of(a) For the purpose of obtaining funds
for the reconstruction, repair and equipment of township buildings, a
township board may issue general obligation bonds as follows:
(1) For any township with a population of not more than 5,000,
the township board is hereby authorized and empowered to issue its
general obligation bonds in an amount not to exceed one percent 1% of
the assessed tangible valuation of such township for the purpose of
obtaining funds for the reconstruction, repair and equipment of
township buildings: Provided, however, Such;
(2) for any township with a population of more than 5,000 but not
more than 10,000, the township board is authorized to issue general
obligation bonds in an amount not to exceed 5% of the assessed
tangible valuation of such township; and
(3) for any township with a population of more than 10,000, the
township board is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in an
amount not to exceed 10% of the assessed tangible valuation of such
township.
(c) No township shall not issue any such bonds until and after an
election therefor has been had, which election shall be held in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 80-104 and 80-105, and
amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 80-1910 is hereby amended to read as follows: 80-
1910. (a) The amount of such bonds issued pursuant to K.S.A. 80-
1909, and amendments thereto, and outstanding at any time shall not
exceed one-half of one percent 5% of the assessed tangible valuation of
all property in such township. Such bonds shall be issued serially to
mature in approximately equal amounts over a period of not to exceed
fifteen (15) 20 years from the date of issue and shall be a lien upon all
taxable property in such township.
(b) Such bonds shall be issued and sold pursuant to the provisions
and conditions of the general bond law except as herein otherwise
specifically provided. The governing body of any such a township
issuing bonds under the provisions of this act K.S.A. 80-1909, and
amendments thereto, shall have authority to levy such taxes as may be
necessary to pay such bonds the principal and interest on such bonds.
(c) The bonded debt limitations set forth in this section shall be
separate from and in addition to any other such limitations on bonded
indebtedness imposed by law.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 80-113 and 80-1910 are hereby repealed.

SENATE BILL No. 7—page 2
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.